Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-454
License; disciplinary actions; hearings; procedure.

(1) If the applicant or licensee requests a hearing under section 71-452, the department shall hold a hearing and give the applicant or licensee the right to present such evidence as may be proper. On the basis of such evidence, the director shall affirm, modify, or set aside the determination. A copy of such decision setting forth the findings of facts and the particular reasons upon which the decision is based shall be sent by either registered or certified mail to the applicant or licensee. The decision shall become final thirty days after the copy is mailed unless the applicant or licensee, within such thirty-day period, appeals the decision under section 71-455.

(2) The procedure governing hearings authorized by this section shall be in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department. A full and complete record shall be kept of all proceedings. Witnesses may be subpoenaed by either party and shall be allowed fees at a rate prescribed by rule and regulation.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 54.